test/tools/stress.random-lexicons-100.lexc
LEXICON N37	
+N37:ijfk	Cases ;
+N37:inmp	Cases ;
+N37:iihä	Cases ;
+N37:ioåg	Cases ;
+N37:ihsn	Cases ;
+N37:iajo	Cases ;
+N37:ixya	Cases ;
+N37:ivnq	Cases ;
+N37:iuqd	Cases ;
+N37:igäo	Cases ;
+N37:iqit	Cases ;
+N37:iduu	Cases ;
+N37:ipäq	Cases ;
+N37:inpn	Cases ;
+N37:ipöc	Cases ;
+N37:ifoa	Cases ;
+N37:isfö	Cases ;
+N37:ivzc	Cases ;
+N37:icwr	Cases ;
+N37:iaka	Cases ;
+N37:inmb	Cases ;
+N37:iomv	Cases ;
+N37:iwzf	Cases ;
+N37:ioip	Cases ;
+N37:iwym	Cases ;
+N37:iaji	Cases ;
+N37:igoy	Cases ;
+N37:igäj	Cases ;
+N37:ixxw	Cases ;
+N37:iaxp	Cases ;
+N37:imzx	Cases ;
+N37:icky	Cases ;
+N37:iywb	Cases ;
+N37:ibfu	Cases ;
+N37:ieqh	Cases ;
+N37:ikwi	Cases ;
+N37:iäzq	Cases ;
+N37:iuxw	Cases ;
+N37:iwhx	Cases ;
+N37:iwua	Cases ;
+N37:imym	Cases ;
+N37:ibjl	Cases ;
+N37:izfy	Cases ;
+N37:ihjh	Cases ;
+N37:ivbr	Cases ;
+N37:iädm	Cases ;
+N37:ihqo	Cases ;
+N37:idtx	Cases ;
+N37:ibeo	Cases ;
+N37:icaf	Cases ;
+N37:iexq	Cases ;
+N37:ikhw	Cases ;
+N37:iidu	Cases ;
+N37:ilwx	Cases ;
+N37:ieho	Cases ;
+N37:ialt	Cases ;
+N37:iokb	Cases ;
+N37:ifwn	Cases ;
+N37:ivws	Cases ;
+N37:ibåö	Cases ;
+N37:ifgå	Cases ;
+N37:iqåo	Cases ;
+N37:ivie	Cases ;
+N37:igko	Cases ;
+N37:imml	Cases ;
+N37:iiöå	Cases ;
+N37:iyöm	Cases ;
+N37:isbh	Cases ;
+N37:ibiä	Cases ;
+N37:iawz	Cases ;
+N37:ijww	Cases ;
+N37:ikpp	Cases ;
+N37:ihcl	Cases ;
+N37:itöb	Cases ;
+N37:ivdy	Cases ;
+N37:igln	Cases ;
+N37:iöir	Cases ;
+N37:iida	Cases ;
+N37:inkf	Cases ;
+N37:iwch	Cases ;
+N37:ihad	Cases ;
+N37:icyf	Cases ;
+N37:ilxw	Cases ;
+N37:iwxl	Cases ;
+N37:iyrd	Cases ;
+N37:iuss	Cases ;
+N37:inpb	Cases ;
+N37:iålo	Cases ;
+N37:ilyd	Cases ;
+N37:ixkd	Cases ;
+N37:ijak	Cases ;
+N37:iädj	Cases ;
+N37:iåns	Cases ;
+N37:iöde	Cases ;
+N37:iwij	Cases ;
+N37:iöla	Cases ;
+N37:ihpr	Cases ;
+N37:irbc	Cases ;
+N37:itks	Cases ;


LEXICON N38	
+N38:jöez	Cases ;
+N38:jklå	Cases ;
+N38:jdnz	Cases ;
+N38:jöxq	Cases ;
+N38:jiez	Cases ;
+N38:jmtq	Cases ;
+N38:jjic	Cases ;
+N38:jgih	Cases ;
+N38:jmxq	Cases ;
+N38:jöfo	Cases ;
+N38:jsäo	Cases ;
+N38:jyhb	Cases ;
+N38:jicr	Cases ;
+N38:jäxe	Cases ;
+N38:jäum	Cases ;
+N38:jgjö	Cases ;
+N38:jlöi	Cases ;
+N38:josd	Cases ;
+N38:jöäk	Cases ;
+N38:jghu	Cases ;
+N38:jepy	Cases ;
+N38:jbdf	Cases ;
+N38:jsxf	Cases ;
+N38:jono	Cases ;
+N38:jsax	Cases ;
+N38:jvhh	Cases ;
+N38:jndv	Cases ;
+N38:jåab	Cases ;
+N38:jxxj	Cases ;
+N38:jhqz	Cases ;
+N38:jåxl	Cases ;
+N38:jowg	Cases ;
+N38:jplz	Cases ;
+N38:jhet	Cases ;
+N38:jömr	Cases ;
+N38:jhda	Cases ;
+N38:jvss	Cases ;
+N38:jwpv	Cases ;
+N38:jyyt	Cases ;
+N38:jxwd	Cases ;
+N38:jzmu	Cases ;
+N38:jdyp	Cases ;
+N38:jfhs	Cases ;
+N38:jjåb	Cases ;
+N38:jszh	Cases ;
+N38:jtlg	Cases ;
+N38:joju	Cases ;
+N38:jdyb	Cases ;
+N38:jxfl	Cases ;
+N38:jhtd	Cases ;
+N38:jyak	Cases ;
+N38:jgåc	Cases ;
+N38:jmee	Cases ;
+N38:jjmj	Cases ;
+N38:jopu	Cases ;
+N38:jvcn	Cases ;
+N38:jdet	Cases ;
+N38:jnnx	Cases ;
+N38:jyhv	Cases ;
+N38:jjnz	Cases ;
+N38:jäcä	Cases ;
+N38:jnlz	Cases ;
+N38:jjvg	Cases ;
+N38:jduh	Cases ;
+N38:jlzl	Cases ;
+N38:jfbp	Cases ;
+N38:jlvj	Cases ;
+N38:jbwh	Cases ;
+N38:jglä	Cases ;
+N38:jhxq	Cases ;
+N38:jzrp	Cases ;
+N38:jaqn	Cases ;
+N38:jözs	Cases ;
+N38:jafp	Cases ;
+N38:jqsc	Cases ;
+N38:jäia	Cases ;
+N38:jxfs	Cases ;
+N38:jfqp	Cases ;
+N38:jsml	Cases ;
+N38:jnqs	Cases ;
+N38:jeyk	Cases ;
+N38:jpyd	Cases ;
+N38:jist	Cases ;
+N38:jörj	Cases ;
+N38:jprl	Cases ;
+N38:jace	Cases ;
+N38:jlhä	Cases ;
+N38:jmci	Cases ;
+N38:jina	Cases ;
+N38:jazx	Cases ;
+N38:jhdu	Cases ;
+N38:jsjå	Cases ;
+N38:jrsn	Cases ;
+N38:jede	Cases ;
+N38:jmcs	Cases ;
+N38:jlxu	Cases ;
+N38:jnzq	Cases ;
+N38:jfgk	Cases ;
+N38:jvyu	Cases ;


LEXICON N39	
+N39:kryä	Cases ;
+N39:kåzs	Cases ;
+N39:kkvp	Cases ;
+N39:kyqä	Cases ;
+N39:kzoy	Cases ;
+N39:kckb	Cases ;
+N39:kaby	Cases ;
+N39:khcf	Cases ;
+N39:kchv	Cases ;
+N39:kxsp	Cases ;
+N39:klcb	Cases ;
+N39:kjmm	Cases ;
+N39:kömw	Cases ;
+N39:käbv	Cases ;
+N39:keay	Cases ;
+N39:kbcq	Cases ;
+N39:ketu	Cases ;
+N39:kuzå	Cases ;
+N39:kvoq	Cases ;
+N39:käqy	Cases ;
+N39:ktds	Cases ;
+N39:krqr	Cases ;
+N39:ksra	Cases ;
+N39:kögn	Cases ;
+N39:kmnö	Cases ;
+N39:kåiö	Cases ;
+N39:kpdk	Cases ;
+N39:kehr	Cases ;
+N39:kwol	Cases ;
+N39:kviy	Cases ;
+N39:kqqm	Cases ;
+N39:kptt	Cases ;
+N39:kinu	Cases ;
+N39:koja	Cases ;
+N39:khöj	Cases ;
+N39:ksyq	Cases ;
+N39:kvni	Cases ;
+N39:kaam	Cases ;
+N39:ktpm	Cases ;
+N39:kpeu	Cases ;
+N39:kmvö	Cases ;
+N39:kxmq	Cases ;
+N39:kcåi	Cases ;
+N39:kfvj	Cases ;
+N39:kozs	Cases ;
+N39:kxqo	Cases ;
+N39:kueo	Cases ;
+N39:kaqä	Cases ;
+N39:kyvb	Cases ;
+N39:kkah	Cases ;
+N39:kjeu	Cases ;
+N39:khbn	Cases ;
+N39:krmn	Cases ;
+N39:kfew	Cases ;
+N39:köks	Cases ;
+N39:kxwp	Cases ;
+N39:kldh	Cases ;
+N39:ktdä	Cases ;
+N39:kzho	Cases ;
+N39:kydh	Cases ;
+N39:koeu	Cases ;
+N39:kwpn	Cases ;
+N39:kwmj	Cases ;
+N39:köav	Cases ;
+N39:kåzy	Cases ;
+N39:klrv	Cases ;
+N39:kghv	Cases ;
+N39:kuäf	Cases ;
+N39:kecö	Cases ;
+N39:kfål	Cases ;
+N39:käcf	Cases ;
+N39:kmai	Cases ;
+N39:kivm	Cases ;
+N39:kpck	Cases ;
+N39:kges	Cases ;
+N39:kzfo	Cases ;
+N39:kucy	Cases ;
+N39:kqpv	Cases ;
+N39:kkms	Cases ;
+N39:kfbd	Cases ;
+N39:kölö	Cases ;
+N39:kbwz	Cases ;
+N39:ktmv	Cases ;
+N39:kåyb	Cases ;
+N39:kdqr	Cases ;
+N39:kqdl	Cases ;
+N39:ktkv	Cases ;
+N39:kcoä	Cases ;
+N39:khqi	Cases ;
+N39:kwöå	Cases ;
+N39:kfåw	Cases ;
+N39:kpje	Cases ;
+N39:kmai	Cases ;
+N39:kåsö	Cases ;
+N39:kupn	Cases ;
+N39:kötp	Cases ;
+N39:kfrx	Cases ;
+N39:kbrö	Cases ;
+N39:kvbö	Cases ;


LEXICON N40	
+N4%0:lpdj	Cases ;
+N4%0:lnzb	Cases ;
+N4%0:lxeg	Cases ;
+N4%0:lfhå	Cases ;
+N4%0:lwrp	Cases ;
+N4%0:lsgq	Cases ;
+N4%0:lätx	Cases ;
+N4%0:lbcy	Cases ;
+N4%0:lxdn	Cases ;
+N4%0:lajv	Cases ;
+N4%0:lqqc	Cases ;
+N4%0:löso	Cases ;
+N4%0:lgeu	Cases ;
+N4%0:läqc	Cases ;
+N4%0:lipä	Cases ;
+N4%0:lmit	Cases ;
+N4%0:låäq	Cases ;
+N4%0:liwå	Cases ;
+N4%0:lmoc	Cases ;
+N4%0:lelh	Cases ;
+N4%0:ldfn	Cases ;
+N4%0:lzåz	Cases ;
+N4%0:lcsg	Cases ;
+N4%0:lyja	Cases ;
+N4%0:låus	Cases ;
+N4%0:lohg	Cases ;
+N4%0:lrcu	Cases ;
+N4%0:lbbx	Cases ;
+N4%0:lcdd	Cases ;
+N4%0:ldse	Cases ;
+N4%0:lire	Cases ;
+N4%0:lmzs	Cases ;
+N4%0:ltmu	Cases ;
+N4%0:ltxä	Cases ;
+N4%0:lvth	Cases ;
+N4%0:linå	Cases ;
+N4%0:lefy	Cases ;
+N4%0:lkeh	Cases ;
+N4%0:löil	Cases ;
+N4%0:ldkw	Cases ;
+N4%0:lnpr	Cases ;
+N4%0:lvxc	Cases ;
+N4%0:läom	Cases ;
+N4%0:leåp	Cases ;
+N4%0:lizz	Cases ;
+N4%0:ldnl	Cases ;
+N4%0:lthp	Cases ;
+N4%0:lölb	Cases ;
+N4%0:ljrn	Cases ;
+N4%0:läck	Cases ;
+N4%0:lrbg	Cases ;
+N4%0:luäs	Cases ;
+N4%0:lbåd	Cases ;
+N4%0:lehc	Cases ;
+N4%0:lcmö	Cases ;
+N4%0:lvms	Cases ;
+N4%0:lgäh	Cases ;
+N4%0:lejå	Cases ;
+N4%0:lqvy	Cases ;
+N4%0:lnry	Cases ;
+N4%0:lrsv	Cases ;
+N4%0:lqbl	Cases ;
+N4%0:låän	Cases ;
+N4%0:lrtw	Cases ;
+N4%0:ljiv	Cases ;
+N4%0:lful	Cases ;
+N4%0:ldpg	Cases ;
+N4%0:lsru	Cases ;
+N4%0:lzpj	Cases ;
+N4%0:ldxu	Cases ;
+N4%0:läup	Cases ;
+N4%0:lhhi	Cases ;
+N4%0:lfbk	Cases ;
+N4%0:lgiw	Cases ;
+N4%0:ltly	Cases ;
+N4%0:lhar	Cases ;
+N4%0:lybä	Cases ;
+N4%0:låay	Cases ;
+N4%0:letf	Cases ;
+N4%0:lvel	Cases ;
+N4%0:lzde	Cases ;
+N4%0:lmjb	Cases ;
+N4%0:lhxr	Cases ;
+N4%0:lmne	Cases ;
+N4%0:lqat	Cases ;
+N4%0:lhäu	Cases ;
+N4%0:lvhö	Cases ;
+N4%0:lxxb	Cases ;
+N4%0:ldba	Cases ;
+N4%0:lkgs	Cases ;
+N4%0:läka	Cases ;
+N4%0:lvre	Cases ;
+N4%0:lblq	Cases ;
+N4%0:lohw	Cases ;
+N4%0:lwpm	Cases ;
+N4%0:lmws	Cases ;
+N4%0:lbli	Cases ;
+N4%0:lwkf	Cases ;
+N4%0:lghr	Cases ;

LEXICON Root
h N37 ;
i N38 ;
j N39 ;
k N40 ;
